Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB250.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 278 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Affordable" means the lowest-cost method of providing electricity,
factoring in the true and total cost of each generation source, including but
not limited to considerations of:
1. Potential costs resulting from foreign and domestic supply chain
disruptions;
2. The costs of environmental degradation or remediation resulting from
the use of the generation source;
3. Costs that have been kept artificially low through direct payment to or
subsidization of the generation source by any local, state, or federal
government entity in the preceding five (5) years;
(b) "Clean energy" means:
1. The energy sources listed in 42 U.S.C. sec. 15852(b);
2. Energy produced using hydrocarbon fuels, including natural gas and
coal, in compliance with the relevant requirements of the federal
Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 7401 et seq.; and
3. Energy generated by nuclear reactors;
(c) "Dispatchable" means a source of electric power generation that is
available on demand, that is not intermittent, and that can be adjusted to
increase or decrease its power output upon request of a power grid operator
or otherwise upon demand or request, or that can have its power output
adjusted in response to market or system needs, except during routine
maintenance or repairs;
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/25/2026 1:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2237
(d) "Foreign adversary nation" means any country or entity that is designated
by the federal government as a foreign adversary or country of concern,
including any country or entity that is:
1. Designated as a foreign adversary under 15 C.F.R. sec. 7.4 or
successor federal regulations;
2. Designated as a state sponsor of terrorism by the United States
Department of State;
3. Subject to comprehensive federal sanctions administered by the Office
of Foreign Assets Control;
4. Otherwise determined by the Governor, in consultation with the
Attorney General, to pose a national security, economic security, or
supply chain risk to the United States; or
5. Owned, controlled by, or subject to the jurisdiction or direction of a
foreign adversary nation, including but not limited to state-owned
enterprises, instrumentalities, or companies operating under
compulsory foreign national laws.
(e) "Reliable" means a source of electricity that:
1. Is not subject to intermittent availability, including as a result of
routine expected daily weather; and
2. Has a performance standard of eighty percent (80%) or greater except
during routine maintenance or repairs.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commission shall adopt
rules and policies that will permit the commission, in the exercise of its expertise,
to prioritize securing affordable, reliable, and clean energy within the
Commonwealth by:
(a) Ensuring fuel sources primarily produced within the United States are
prioritized, with the exception of nuclear resources and generation;
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/25/2026 1:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2237
(b) Prohibiting the use of critical materials as defined by the federal Energy Act
of 2020, Pub. L. No. 116-260, that are sourced or manufactured by or in a
foreign adversary nation or that are subject to the prohibitions on the
importation of convict-made goods in 19 U.S.C. sec. 1307;
(c) Giving preference to infrastructure and components built in the
Commonwealth and the United States that are necessary to deliver energy to
customers; and
(d) Ensuring a sufficient supply of clean energy sources that is dispatchable to
meet the demands of residential and commercial customers at all times with
minimal interruptions, even during high usage periods.
Section 2. This Act takes effect November 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/25/2026 1:48 PM Jacketed